Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1606.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 443.8 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 443.8. Personal Needs Allowance Deduction for Medical Assistance-Eligible Persons in Nursing Facilities.--* * *(c) Subject to Federal approval, the personal needs allowance under subsection (a) shall be increased to not less than eighty-five dollars ($85) beginning January 1, 2026.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.1234567891011121314151617